New York, session 2025-2026, A645.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 3000-c of the 2 public health law, as amended by chapter 502 of the laws of 2025, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (a) "Eligible person or entity" means: (i) an ambulance service or 5 advanced life support first response service; a certified first respon- 6 der, firefighter in a county, city, town or village having a population 7 of less than two million provided such county is not wholly located 8 within a city with a population of more than one million, emergency 9 medical technician, or advanced emergency medical technician, who is 10 employed by or an enrolled member of any such service; (ii) a children's 11 overnight camp as defined in subdivision one of section thirteen hundred 12 ninety-two of this chapter, a summer day camp as defined in subdivision 13 two of section thirteen hundred ninety-two of this chapter, a traveling 14 summer day camp as defined in subdivision three of section thirteen 15 hundred ninety-two of this chapter or a person employed by such a camp; 16 (iii) a school district, board of cooperative educational services, 17 county vocational education and extension board, charter school, and 18 non-public elementary and secondary school in this state or any person 19 employed by any such entity, or employed by a contractor of such an 20 entity while performing services for the entity; (iv) a sports, enter- 21 tainment, amusement, education, government, day care or retail facility; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02282-02-6 A. 645--A 2 1 an educational institution, youth organization or sports league; an 2 establishment that serves food; or a person employed by such entity; (v) 3 a police officer or peace officer in a county, city, town or village 4 having a population of less than two million provided such county is not 5 wholly located within a city with a population of more than one million; 6 (vi) forest rangers, park rangers and environmental conservation police 7 officers; [and] (vii) pre-school facilities or any person employed by 8 such facilities; and (viii) any other person or entity designated or 9 approved, or in a category designated or approved pursuant to regu- 10 lations of the commissioner in consultation with other appropriate agen- 11 cies. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 13 have become a law.